Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 12 Motor Carriers of Property
39-12-18.
Revocation of common carrier certificate.

Any irregular- or regular-route common carrier who or that, during any period of not less than sixty (60) consecutive days, fails or has failed to render any part of the service authorized by the common carrier’s certificate, except that for the reason that highways over which the common carrier must operate are impassable because of floods, conditions of the highways, or other reasonable causes, shall be deemed to have abandoned that part of the service authorized by the certificate; and if, after a hearing, the administrator finds that the carrier has so failed to render service in accordance with the common carrier’s certificate and not for any reason set forth in the foregoing exceptions, the common carrier’s rights thereto to the extent of the common carrier’s failure to render service shall be forfeited; and the administrator shall revoke or reissue the common carrier’s certificate subject to the resulting limitations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-19.
Revocation of contract carrier permit.

Any contract carrier by motor vehicle who, during any period of not less than one year, fails or has failed to render any part of the service authorized by the contract carrier’s permit, except for the reason that the highways over which the contract carrier must operate are impassable because of floods, conditions of the highways, or for other reasonable causes, shall be deemed to have abandoned that part of the service authorized by the contract carrier’s permit; and if, after a hearing, the administrator finds that the carrier has so failed to render service in accordance with the contract carrier’s permit, and not for any reason set forth in the foregoing exceptions, the contract carrier’s rights thereto, to the extent of the contract carrier’s failure to render service, shall be forfeited; and the administrator shall reissue the contract carrier’s permit subject to the resulting limitations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-20.
Transfer of certificates or permits — Joint control of common carriers.

Any common-carrier certificate or any contract-carrier permit may be assigned and transferred, in whole or in part, by the holder thereof, his or her assignee, receiver, trustee, or by the holder’s personal representative, or by the surviving partner or partners of the deceased partner to which the rights and privileges under the certificate or permit shall pass at the death of the holder, upon his or her application to the administrator. The transfer and assignment must receive the consent and approval of the administrator, after public notice, in the manner provided in §§

39-12-6

and

39-12-9

, and a public hearing, at which the proposed transferee shall have established to the satisfaction of the administrator his or her willingness, fitness, and ability to perform or furnish transportation for compensation under the certificate or permit. No certificate or permit may be transferred in part, unless the rights are clearly severable; and no certificate or permit shall be transferred, in whole or in part, except in connection with the bona fide sale to the transferee of the business of the transferor. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred and fifty dollars ($250). All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. It shall be unlawful for any person to accomplish or effectuate or to participate in accomplishing or effectuating the control or management in a common interest of any two (2) or more common carriers, however such a result is attained, whether directly or indirectly, by use of common directors, officers, or stockholders, or in any manner whatsoever. As used in this section, the words “control and management” shall be construed to include the power to exercise control and management. The holder of either a common-carrier certificate or a contract-carrier permit shall not acquire the operating rights held by another person through a transfer proceeding unless, both operating rights are merged simultaneously and not until the application to transfer is approved by the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-26

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-20

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 2.

39-12-21.
Dual operations.

Persons holding a certificate as a common carrier may also perform as a contract carrier under the authority of certificate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 5, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-27

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-21

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 409, § 1.

39-12-21.1.
Filing of contracts.

Contracts entered into by a certified carrier shall be filed with the division of public utilities and carriers as part of the carrier’s tariffs and shall be subject to the division’s approval after public notification and public hearing by the division of public utilities and carriers as provided in this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 409, § 2.

39-12-22.
Issuance of a permit to interstate carriers.

Every motor carrier engaged in transporting property over the highways of this state for compensation, in interstate commerce, shall file an application with the administrator for a permit of registration. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Upon a showing by the carrier that it has been authorized by the Interstate Commerce Commission to conduct an operation into, from, within, or through this state, and that the carrier is in compliance with all other requirements of this chapter, the administrator shall issue a permit of registration to the carrier as soon as possible, and the carrier shall not so operate in interstate commerce unless and until the permit of registration shall have been issued. The motor carrier shall be required to file with the administrator only that portion of its interstate authority permitting operations within the borders of this state, and the motor carrier shall not be required to file with the administrator emergency or temporary operating authority having a duration of thirty (30) consecutive days or less, if the carrier has registered its interstate authority and registered and identified its vehicles under the provisions of this chapter. The administrator shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations governing the registration of interstate authority. Every intrastate motor carrier holding either a common-carrier certificate or a contract-carrier permit from the administrator is hereby granted the right to operate motor vehicles in interstate commerce in the transportation of property for compensation, as authorized by the Interstate Commerce Commission, without obtaining an interstate permit of registration from the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 6, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 6, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1543, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 6, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-28

—

39-12-30

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-22

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 32; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 4; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 13; P.L. 1980, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 35, § 1.

39-12-23.
Transfer of interstate carrier permit.

Any permit of registration may be assigned and transferred by the holder thereof, his or her assignee, receiver, trustee, or by the holder’s personal representative, or by the surviving partner or partners of the deceased partner to which the right under the permit shall pass at the death of the holder upon application to the administrator. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). The transferor shall establish before the administrator that the operating authority to engage in interstate commerce in transportation for compensation is to be or has been transferred with the approval of the Interstate Commerce Commission. The administrator may establish such reasonable rules and regulations as he or she may deem necessary pertaining to the transfer and assignment of permits of registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 5; P.L. 1980, ch. 339, § 1.

39-12-24.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 6, § 4; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-31

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-24

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 18.

39-12-25.
Operation by fiduciary.

In the event of the decease, incompetency, insolvency, bankruptcy, or corporate reorganization under the bankruptcy law of the United States, of a holder of a certificate or permit that authorizes motor carrier operations in intrastate commerce under this chapter, the administrator, upon application or notification of his or her executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, assignee, trustee, or receiver, shall conditionally operate the certificate or permit as a fiduciary, pending the filing of an application to transfer the certificate or permit and pending the decision of the administrator as to the fitness, willingness, and ability of the transferee to conduct the operation or business authorized by the certificate or permit. In the event of the decease, incompetency, insolvency, or bankruptcy of a member of a partnership holding the certificate or permit, the administrator upon receipt of notification of the remaining partner or partners, or of the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, assignee, trustee, or receiver of the deceased, incompetent, insolvent, or bankrupt partner, may make a like conditional transfer to the remaining partner or partners. Upon application of the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, assignee, trustee, receiver, surviving, or remaining partner, the administrator may transfer the certificate or permit in accordance with the provisions of this chapter from the original holder to any person named in the application and approved by the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-26.
Registration and identification of vehicles.

Every interstate motor carrier engaged in the transportation of property for compensation over the highways of this state, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall register and identify all vehicles to be operated in the state in accordance with the provisions contained in and mandated under the federal “Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users” (SAFETEA-LU) (Public Law 109-59, enacted August 10, 2005), the Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005 (Included within SAFETEA-LU), and the Unified Carrier Registration Agreement (UCRA) (§§ 4302 — 4308 of SAFETEA-LU), and/or any related successor federal law(s). All intrastate carriers not subject to the provisions of the foregoing federal law shall apply to the administrator for the issuance of a vehicle identification device for the registration and identification of vehicles and shall be assessed twenty dollars ($20.00) for each identification device for which an application is made. All revenues received shall be deposited as general revenues. The identification device shall be furnished annually to every carrier whose duty it shall be to apply for it. It shall be unlawful for any motor vehicle to be engaged in transporting property for compensation in either intrastate or interstate commerce without the owner of it having applied for and received the required identification device, unless the vehicle is exempted from the provisions of this chapter. Each identification device shall be accompanied by a registration card issued by the administrator, which shall be in the possession of the vehicle’s driver when the vehicle is operating. Transfers of the identification device from one vehicle to another are hereby prohibited unless authorized by the administrator. The administrator, in his or her discretion, may refuse to reissue the identification device to the holder of any certificate, permit, or permit of registration, pending any complaint or hearing upon the question of revocation or suspension or in which such question is involved. The administrator shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations governing the registration and identification of motor vehicles authorized for operation under this chapter. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 5, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 5, § 11; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-25

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-26

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 32; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 6; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 13; P.L. 1980, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 508, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 129; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 2.

39-12-27.
Security for protection of the public.

No certificate or permit shall be issued to a motor carrier or remain in force, unless the carrier shall have furnished the administrator with evidence of insured financial responsibility. Each motor carrier shall satisfy the requirements by furnishing the administrator with proof of the carrier’s ability to meet any and all legally established claim or claims for damages by reason of personal injury to, or the death of, any one person in an amount of at least two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or by reason of personal injuries to, or the death of, all persons injured or killed in any one accident of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) (subject to a maximum of two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for bodily injuries to or the death of one person), and for damages to property (excluding cargo) in the amount of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). A filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) must accompany each insurance filing. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. No common or contract carrier by motor vehicle shall engage in intrastate commerce, nor shall any certificate or permit be issued to the carrier or remain in force, unless and until there shall be filed with the administrator evidence of insured financial responsibility by the carriers to meet any and all legally established claim or claims for loss or damage to all property belonging to the shipper or consignee and coming into possession of the carriers in connection with their motor carrier transportation service in an amount of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); provided, however, that the requirements of this section shall not apply in connection with the transportation of commodities declared by the administrator, after notice and hearing, to be exempt from cargo insurance requirements. Each motor carrier required by the provisions of this chapter to furnish evidence of insured financial responsibility shall satisfy such requirements by filing with the administrator:

A certificate of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state, showing that the motor carrier has a policy of insurance in force insuring the carrier against public liability, property damage, and damage or loss to cargo, in at least the minimum amounts herein prescribed; or

A certificate on blanks furnished by the administrator and issued by the general treasurer that the motor carrier has filed with the general treasurer a bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in Rhode Island and conditioned upon payment of any sum up to and including the maximum amounts required in this section in the satisfaction of any final judgment rendered as the result of any claim, or claims, for damages against the motor carrier. The administrator will give consideration to and will approve the application of a motor carrier to qualify as a self-insurer in lieu of the insurance prescribed in this section, if the carrier furnishes a true and accurate statement of its financial condition and other evidence as will establish to the satisfaction of the administrator the ability of the motor carrier to satisfy its obligations for liability and bodily injury or death and liability for the property damage in the minimum amounts prescribed therein without affecting the stability or permanency of the business of the motor carriers. All certificates of insurance, surety bonds, and other securities and agreements filed with the administrator must show the coverage effective continuously until canceled. Certificates of insurance, surety bonds, and other securities and agreements shall not be canceled or withdrawn until after thirty (30) days’ notice in writing by the insurance company, surety or sureties, motor carrier, or other party thereto, as the case may be, has first been given to the administrator at his or her office in Providence, which period of time shall commence to run from the date the notice is actually received at the office of the administrator. However, the surety bonds, certificates of insurance, and other securities and agreements may be canceled prior to the expiration of the thirty (30) days, if on or before the date notice of cancellation is received at the office of the administrator, a replacement filing acceptable to the administrator shall have been received, the replacement being effective on or before the effective date of the cancellation. No cancellation may become effective before the date of receipt of the notice by the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 7, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-33

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-27

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 118; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-27.1.
Advertisements by transporters of household goods.

Every motor carrier engaged in the transportation of household goods between points within the state including a carrier providing a service incidental to or part of the intrastate transportation shall include and shall require each of its agents to include in every advertisement as defined in this section, the name or trade name of the motor carrier under whose operating authority the advertised service will originate and the certificate of public convenience number or permit number issued to the operating authority by the public utilities commission.

As used in this section, “advertisement” shall mean any written or printed communication to the public in connection with an offer or sale of any intrastate transportation service but not including the name, address, and telephone number of the carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-28.
Bill of lading requirements — Liability for damages.

Any common carrier subject to the provisions of this chapter, receiving property for transportation between points within this state, shall issue a receipt or bill of lading therefor, and shall be liable to the lawful holder thereof for any loss, damage, or injury to the property caused by it or by any other common carrier to which the property may be delivered or over whose line or lines the property may pass within this state when transported on a through bill of lading, and any common carrier so receiving property for transportation between points within this state or any common carrier delivering the property so received and transported shall be liable to the lawful holder of the receipt or bill of lading or to any party entitled to recover thereon, whether the receipt or bill of lading has been issued or not, for the actual loss, damage, or injury to the property caused by it or by any common carrier to which the property may be delivered or over whose line or lines the property may pass within this state when transported on a through bill of lading notwithstanding any limitation of liability or limitation of the amount of recovery or representation or agreement as to value in any receipt or bill of lading, or any contract, rule, regulation, or in any tariff filed with the administrator; and the limitation without respect to the manner or form in which it is sought to be made is hereby declared to be unlawful and void; provided, however, that the provisions hereof respecting liability for full actual loss, damage, or injury, notwithstanding any limitation of liability or recovery or representation or agreement or release as to value and declaring any limitation to be unlawful and void, shall not apply to property received for transportation concerning which the motor carrier shall have been or shall hereafter be expressly authorized or required by order of the administrator to establish and maintain rates dependent upon the value declared in writing by the shipper or agreed upon in writing as the released value of the property, in which case the declaration or agreement shall have no other effect than to limit liability and recovery to an amount not exceeding the value so declared or released; and any tariff or schedule which may be filed with the administrator pursuant to the order shall contain specific reference thereto and may establish rates varying with the value so declared and agreed upon; and the administrator is hereby empowered to make the order in cases where rates dependent upon and varying with declared or agreed value would, in his or her opinion, be just and reasonable under the circumstances surrounding the transportation; provided, further, that nothing in this chapter shall deprive any holder of a receipt or bill of lading of any remedy or right of action which he or she has under existing law; provided, further, that it shall be unlawful for any motor common carrier to provide by rule, contract, regulation, or otherwise, a shorter period for the filing of claims than nine (9) months, and for the institution of suits than two (2) years, the period for institution of suits to be computed from the day when notice in writing is given by the carrier to the claimant that the carrier has disallowed the claim or any part or parts thereof specified in the notice; and, provided, further, that the liability imposed in this section shall also apply to property reconsigned or diverted in accordance with the applicable tariff filed as in this chapter provided. The common carrier issuing the receipt or bill of lading, or delivering the property so received and transported, shall be entitled to recover from the common carrier over whose lines the loss, damage, or injury shall have been sustained, the amount of the loss, damage, or injury as it may be required to pay to the owners of the property, as may be evidenced by any receipt, judgment, or transcript thereof, and the amount of any expense reasonably incurred by it in defending the action at law brought by the owners of the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 341, § 1.

39-12-29.
Agent for service of process, notices, or orders on interstate carriers.

Every motor carrier of property operating in interstate commerce over the highways of this state, in the transportation of property for compensation, shall file with the administrator a designation in writing of the name and post office address of a person in this state upon whom or which service of process, notices, or orders may be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-30.
Accounts, records, and reports.

The administrator is hereby authorized to require annual, periodical, or special reports from all motor carriers, subject to the provisions of this chapter; to prescribe the manner and form in which the reports shall be made; and to require from the carriers specific and full, true, and correct answers to all questions upon which the administrator may deem information to be necessary. The annual reports shall give an account of the affairs of the carrier in such form and detail as may be prescribed by the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-31.
Employment of personnel.

The administrator is hereby authorized to employ such clerical force and inspectors as shall be necessary to enforce and carry into effect the provisions of this chapter within his or her appropriation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 1936 (s. s.), ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-40

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-31

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-32.
Enforcement powers of inspectors.

Examiners, field investigators, hearing officers, regulatory inspectors, and other employees of the division designated by the administrator with respect to the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, shall have and exercise, throughout this state, all powers of police officers, including the power to arrest, without warrant, any person who violates any provision of this chapter, and the agents may serve all process lawfully issued by the administrator. Whenever a complaint is made of any violation of the provisions of this chapter by any examiner, field investigator, hearing officer, regulatory inspector, or any other employee of the division designated by the administrator to enforce the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall not be required to furnish surety for costs or be liable for costs upon any complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 1936 (s. s.), ch. 2462, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§ 39-12-41, 39-12-42; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-32

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 7.

39-12-33.
Enforcement by police departments.

The administrator is hereby authorized to avail himself or herself of such state, city, and town police departments as are or may hereafter be existing by law, to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the rules, regulations, and orders of the administrator made under this chapter; and the police departments are hereby given the necessary authority and power, in addition to those they now possess, to carry into effect the directions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 9, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-43

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-33

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-34.
Self-incrimination — Immunity from prosecution.

No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any books, accounts, records, memoranda, correspondence, or other documents in any investigation or inquiry by or upon any hearing before the administrator, when ordered to do so by the administrator, upon the ground that the testimony or evidence, books, accounts, records, memoranda, correspondence, or other documents required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to penalties or forfeitures; but no person shall be prosecuted, punished, or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any act, transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she shall, under oath, by order of the administrator, have testified or produced documentary evidence; provided, that no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for any perjury committed by him or her in his or her testimony. Nothing in this section is intended to give or shall be construed as in any manner giving any corporation immunity of any kind from the law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-35.
Orders, rules, and regulations — Suspension or revocation of certificate or permits.

Every person, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall be subject to such reasonable orders, rules, and regulations as shall, after a public hearing, be adopted and promulgated by the administrator. For willful or continued failure to comply with orders, rules, and regulations, or for willful or continued failure to comply with the terms and conditions of any certificate or permit granted under this chapter or previous laws, the administrator, after notice and hearing, or after failure to appear at a hearing of which due notice has been given, may suspend or modify or revoke the permit or certificate, subject however, to the right of appeal as to the reasonableness and lawfulness of the suspension or revocation or modification to the public utility hearing board as provided in chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 7, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-32

; G.L. 1956, § 32-12-35; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-36.
Unlawful operations — Penalty.

Any person, subject to the provisions of this chapter, who shall knowingly or willfully cause to be done any act prohibited by this chapter, or who shall be guilty of any violation of this chapter for which no penalty is otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and shall, upon conviction thereof, be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or both for each offense.

The administrator may in his or her discretion in lieu of seeking criminal sanctions, impose upon its regulated common or contract carriers an administrative civil penalty (fine) in lieu of revoking or suspending the carrier’s operating authority as conferred under this chapter. The fine shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per each violation of the sections contained in this chapter or the division’s rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 8, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-35

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-36

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 446, § 1.

39-12-37.
Rebate, concession, discrimination, or fraudulent evasion of regulation.

Any person, whether carrier, shipper, consignee, or any officer, employee, agent, or representative thereof who:

Shall knowingly offer, grant, or give or solicit, accept, or receive any rebate, concession, or discrimination in violation of any provisions of this chapter; or

Who by means of any false statement or representation, or by use of any false or fictitious bill, bill of lading, receipt, voucher, roll, account, claim, certificate, affidavit, disposition, lease, or bill of sale, or by any other means or device, shall knowingly and willfully assist, suffer, or permit any person or persons to obtain transportation of property subject to this chapter for less than the applicable rate of charge; or

Who shall knowingly and willfully, by any means or otherwise, fraudulently seek to evade or defeat regulation as in this chapter provided for motor carriers;

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than three hundred dollars ($300) or by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 8, §§ 2 — 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 8, §§ 2 — 4; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

39-12-36

—

39-12-38

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-37

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-38.
Unauthorized divulging of information by administrator’s personnel.

Any examiner, investigator, hearing officer, accountant, regulatory inspector, or field investigator, who shall knowingly and willfully divulge any facts or information that may come to his or her knowledge during the course of any examination or inspection made under authority of §

39-12-5

, except as he or she may be directed by the administrator or by a court or judge thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject, upon conviction, to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-38.1.
Records and abstract of cases.

A full record shall be kept by every court in this state of every case in which a person is charged with violation of any provision of this chapter, and an abstract of the record shall be sent by the court to the administrator within ten (10) days of the time when the case is disposed of. The abstract shall be made upon forms prepared by the administrator and shall include all necessary information as to the parties to the cause; the nature of the offense; the date of the hearing; the plea; the decision; the judgment and result; and every abstract shall be certified by the clerk of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 209, § 8.

39-12-39.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and in so doing shall take into consideration the fees collected under this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-39

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 113.

39-12-40 — 39-12-42.
[Repealed.]

39-12-43.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or of any rule, regulation, or order made thereunder, or the application thereof to any persons or circumstances is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter, rule, regulation, or order, and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter; and it is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been enacted if the invalid parts had not been included therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2268, art. 10, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 99, art. 10, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1805, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-44

; G.L. 1956, §

39-12-43

; P.L. 1958, ch. 87, § 1.

39-12-44.
[Obsolete.]